Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.41
Subdivision real estate; industrial or commercial properties.

Sections 81-885.33 to 81-885.40 shall not apply to the sale or lease of lots in a subdivision for industrial or commercial properties.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 41.